Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.125

Direct petition method—Commencement of proceedings—Notice to legislative body—Meeting—Assumption of indebtedness—Comprehensive plan.

Proceedings for the annexation of territory pursuant to RCW 35.13.130, 35.13.140, 35.13.150, 35.13.160 and 35.13.170 shall be commenced as provided in this section. Prior to the circulation of a petition for annexation, the initiating party or parties who, except as provided in RCW 28A.335.110, shall be either not less than ten percent of the residents of the area to be annexed or the owners of not less than ten percent in value, according to the assessed valuation for general taxation of the property for which annexation is petitioned, shall notify the legislative body of the city or town in writing of their intention to commence annexation proceedings. The legislative body shall set a date, not later than sixty days after the filing of the request, for a meeting with the initiating parties to determine whether the city or town will accept, reject, or geographically modify the proposed annexation, whether it shall require the simultaneous adoption of the comprehensive plan if such plan has been prepared and filed for the area to be annexed as provided for in RCW 35.13.177 and 35.13.178, and whether it shall require the assumption of all or of any portion of existing city or town indebtedness by the area to be annexed. If the legislative body requires the assumption of all or of any portion of indebtedness and/or the adoption of a comprehensive plan, it shall record this action in its minutes and the petition for annexation shall be so drawn as to clearly indicate this fact. There shall be no appeal from the decision of the legislative body.

[ 1990 c 33 s 565; 1989 c 351 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 164 s 11; 1971 c 69 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 88 s 10; 1965 c 7 s 35.13.125. Prior: 1961 c 282 s 18.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.

Severability—1971 c 69: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 c 69 s 5.]